Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.110

Filing objections to recommended decision—Final decision—Waiver.

After the issuance of a recommended decision all interested parties shall have a period of not less than ten days to file objections or exceptions with the director. Thereafter the director shall take such objections and exceptions as are filed into consideration and shall issue and publish his or her final decision which may be the same as the recommended decision or may be revised in the light of said objections and exceptions. Upon written waiver executed by all parties of record at any hearing or by their attorneys of record the director may in his or her discretion omit compliance with the provisions of this section.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6070; 1961 c 256 s 11.]